North Carolina, session 2025, SB38.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to Hertford County the
nonrecurring sum of fifty-one million dollars ($51,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
used for purposes consistent with this act. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
funds appropriated by this act shall not revert at the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year but shall
remain available for expenditure in accordance with this act until the earlier of (i) the date the
funds are expended or (ii) June 30, 2027, at which time the funds shall revert to the General Fund.
Hertford County may allocate funds it receives under this act to the Hertford County Rural
Development Authority (the "RDA") to be used by the RDA for purposes consistent with
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. Funds appropriated to Hertford County by this act shall
be allocated as follows:
(1) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for the construction of a public industrial
dock and barge at the future "Hertford County River Industrial Park" located
at 931 River Road in Hertford County, tax parcel PIN 6925-99-9558, (the
"Flowers site").
(2) Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) for road construction at the Flowers site.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S38-v-1*